Alabama, session 2026rs, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
12 Section 1. Section 34-24-140, as last amended by Act
13 2025-335, 2025 Regular Session, and Section 34-24-160, Code of
14 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
15 "§34-24-140
16 (a) There is established a State Board of Chiropractic
17 Examiners. The board shall be composed of nine members. Eight
18 members of the board shall be active licensed chiropractors
19 elected as provided in this section. Seven of the elected
20 members shall be elected one from each congressional district
21 in this state except as otherwise provided in Section
22 34-24-141. Any candidate for or member of the board shall be a
23 resident of the appropriate congressional district except one
24 candidate for the board shall be elected from the state
25 at-large. One elected member of the board shall be elected
26 from the state at-large and shall be an African-American.
27 (b) Each elected member of or candidate for the board
28 shall meet all of the following qualifications:
Page 1

shall meet all of the following qualifications:
SB210 Enrolled
29 (1) Be Is a resident of this state who has resided in
30 this state for at least five years.
31 (2) Be Is a graduate of a chartered chiropractic school
32 or college that required actual attendance in the school as a
33 prerequisite to graduation.
34 (3) Currently is Is currently engaged in the clinical
35 practice of chiropractic and has been engaged in the clinical
36 practice in this state for at least the five immediately
37 preceding years.
38 (4) Has renewed his or her license to practice
39 chiropractic by September 30 of the year in which an election
40 shall take place.
41 (5) Be Is of good moral character.
42 (6) Is not presently on probation relating to the
43 practice of chiropractic in any state.
44 (c) One member of the board shall be a consumer member
45 appointed by the Governor. Neither the consumer member nor his
46 or her spouse may be a chiropractor. The consumer member may
47 not be an immediate family member of a chiropractor nor may he
48 or she be employed in the chiropractic field.
49 (d)(1) The elected members of the board shall be
50 elected as provided in this subsection. In August of any year
51 that the term of a member of the board expires, the board
52 shall send a notice of the election of the board and the
53 method of qualifying as a candidate to each active licensed
54 chiropractor in the district where the vacancy occurs
55 according to his or her permanent mailing address.
56 (2) The election provided for in this subsection shall
Page 2

(2) The election provided for in this subsection shall
SB210 Enrolled
57 be conducted by an independent agency unless there is only one
58 candidate for the board and in this situation, in which case
59 the board shall announce the results. The board shall set a
60 period for candidates to qualify and the date for the ballots
61 to be sent. Candidates shall qualify by submitting their name
62 to the executive director of the board during the qualifying
63 period which shall be not less than 20 days nor more than 40
64 days after the notice is sent.
65 (3) Not less than 14 days after the deadline for
66 qualification, each licensed chiropractor shall be sent a
67 ballot for the appropriate congressional district where the
68 vacancy is to be filled. In order to be counted, the ballots
69 shall must be returned and time stamped not later than 14
70 business days after the ballots were sent by the independent
71 agency.
72 (4) The results of the election shall be certified by
73 the independent agency. The ballots shall be maintained for a
74 period of six months by the independent agency. The candidate
75 with a simple majority of the votes cast in each respective
76 congressional district shall be elected to the board position
77 for that congressional district. In the event If no candidate
78 in a district receives a majority of the votes, the board
79 shall hold a run-off election in the same manner as provided
80 in this subsection.
81 (5) The members of the board shall take office at the
82 first meeting of the board after the election and the
83 executive director of the board shall set the date of the
84 first meeting of the board after the election of the new
Page 3

first meeting of the board after the election of the new
SB210 Enrolled
85 board.
86 (e) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board, whether by
87 death, resignation of a member, or other cause, the vacancy
88 shall be filled in the same manner as the original election or
89 appointment for the remainder of the term of office.
90 (f)(1) The board may employ investigators, inspectors,
91 attorneys, and any other agents, employees, and assistants as
92 may be necessary, and may use any other means necessary to
93 bring about and maintain a rigid administration and
94 enforcement of administer and enforce state and federal law.
95 (2) The board may issue subpoenas and compel the
96 attendance of witnesses and the production of all necessary
97 papers, books, records, documentary evidence and materials, or
98 other evidence. Any individual failing or refusing to appear
99 or testify regarding any matter about which he or she may be
100 lawfully questioned or to produce any papers, books, records,
101 documentary evidence or materials, or other evidence in the
102 matter to be heard, after having been required by order of the
103 board or by a or subpoena of the board to do so, upon
104 application by the board to any circuit judge of this state,
105 may be ordered to comply therewith. Upon failure to comply
106 with the order of the circuit judge, the court may compel
107 obedience by attachment as for contempt as in case of
108 disobedience of a similar order or subpoena issued by the
109 court. The president or secretary-treasurer of the board may
110 issue subpoenas, and any board member may administer oaths to
111 witnesses or take their affirmation. A subpoena or other
112 process of paper may be served upon any person named therein,
Page 4

process of paper may be served upon any person named therein,
SB210 Enrolled
113 anywhere within this state, by any officer authorized to serve
114 subpoenas or other process or paper in civil actions, in the
115 same manner as is prescribed by law for subpoenas issued out
116 of the circuit courts of this state, the fees and mileage and
117 other costs to be paid as the board directs.
118 (g) The board shall employ an executive director who
119 shall be responsible for the administration of board policy.
120 The executive director may be licensed to practice
121 chiropractic in this state.
122 (h) The board shall publish annually a directory
123 listing all permit holders and all persons licensed to
124 practice chiropractic in this state. Copies of the directory
125 shall be made available from the executive director at a cost
126 set by rule of the board.
127 (i) The membership of the board shall be inclusive and
128 reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
129 economic diversity of the state.
130 (j) Each member of the board shall meet all
131 qualifications to be a candidate for his or her seat on the
132 board during his or her entire term. Any member who fails to
133 continue to meet the qualifications for his or her seat shall
134 forfeit his or her seat on the board and resign or the board
135 seat shall be declared vacant by the board."
136 "§34-24-160
137 (a) Any person individual wishing the right to practice
138 chiropractic shall make application to the State Board of
139 Chiropractic Examiners in the form as the board may prescribe.
140 (b)(1) In addition to other requirements established by
Page 5

(b)(1) In addition to other requirements established by
SB210 Enrolled
141 law and for the purpose of determining an applicant's
142 suitability for a license to practice chiropractic, each
143 applicant shall submit a complete set of fingerprints to the
144 State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board.
145 (2) The board shall submit the fingerprints provided by
146 each applicant for a license to practice chiropractic to the
147 Alabama Bureau of Investigation (ABI) Alabama State Law
148 Enforcement Agency. The fingerprints shall be forwarded by the
149 ABI board or agency to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
150 (FBI) for a state and national criminal history record
151 background check. Costs associated with conducting a criminal
152 history background check shall be borne by the applicant.
153 (3) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board
154 shall keep information received pursuant to this section
155 confidential, except that such any information received and
156 relied upon in denying the issuance of a license to practice
157 chiropractic in this state may be disclosed as may be
158 necessary to support the denial. This requirement also shall
159 apply to any person who is not licensed as a chiropractor who
160 applies for a permit pursuant to Section 34-24-123(b).
161 (c) Each applicant shall be of good moral character,
162 and a citizen of the United States or, if not a citizen of the
163 United States, a person an individual who is legally present
164 in the United States with appropriate documentation from the
165 federal government.
166 (d) Each applicant shall be a graduate of a chartered
167 chiropractic school or college accredited by the council of
168 chiropractic education which teaches only attendance courses
Page 6

chiropractic education which teaches only attendance courses
SB210 Enrolled
169 and requires a minimum four-year standard college course
170 Council of Chiropractic Education or a successor entity.
171 (e) An applicant for licensure who graduated from
172 chiropractic college after January 1, 2010, shall have a
173 bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university.
174 Absent a bachelor's degree, the requirement may be met by an
175 academic graduate degree from a regionally accredited college
176 or university and proof that the applicant has taken a
177 nationally recognized standardized test commensurate with that
178 applicant's graduate degree.
179 (f) The An application shall be signed by the applicant
180 in his or her own handwriting, and shall be notarized, and
181 shall recite the history of the applicant's educational
182 qualifications, how long he or she has studied chiropractic,
183 what collateral branches, if any, he or she has studied, and
184 the length of time he or she has engaged in clinical practice,
185 with proof thereof in the form of diplomas, certificates, and
186 transcripts, etc.
187 (g) Each applicant shall submit with his or her
188 application satisfactory evidence of good character and
189 reputation.
190 (h)(1) Each applicant for licensure shall pay to the
191 board a license application fee of not less than fifty dollars
192 ($50) and not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the
193 exact amount to be fixed annually by resolution of the State
194 Board of Chiropractic Examiners as set by rule of the board.
195 The fee shall accompany the application.
196 (2) A fee of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not
Page 7

(2) A fee of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not
SB210 Enrolled
197 more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the exact amount
198 to be fixed by resolution of the State Board of Chiropractic
199 Examiners as set by rule of the board, shall be paid for any
200 subsequent examination."
201 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
202 1, 2026.
Page 8

1, 2026.
SB210 Enrolled
203
204
205
206
207
208
209 ________________________________________________
210 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
211
212
213
214 ________________________________________________
215 Speaker of the House of Representatives
216
217
218 SB210
219 Senate 17-Feb-26
220 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
221 the Senate.
222
223 Patrick Harris,
224 Secretary.
225
226
227
228
229 House of Representatives
230 Passed: 17-Mar-26
231
232
233
234
235 By: Senator Woods
Page 9